Illinois, session 104th, SB3211.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4 and 17.2 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 25/4)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)8    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 10by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 11file or license file as maintained by the Department's 12licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 13licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 14those changes must be made either through the Department's 15website or by contacting the Department. 16    "Email address of record" means the designated email 17address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 18application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 19by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 20    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 21Professional Regulation.22    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 23Professional Regulation.  SB3211 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1    "Board" means the Board of Dentistry.2    "Dentist" means a person who has received a general 3license pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 11 of this Act, 4and who may perform any intraoral and extraoral procedure 5required in the practice of dentistry, and to whom is reserved 6the responsibilities specified in Section 17.7    "Dental hygienist" means a person who holds a license 8under this Act to perform dental services as authorized by 9Section 18.10    "Dental assistant" means an appropriately trained person 11who, under the supervision of a dentist, provides dental 12services as authorized by Section 17.13    "Expanded function dental assistant" means a dental 14assistant who has completed the training required by Section 1517.1 of this Act. 16    "Dental laboratory" means a person, firm, or corporation 17which:18        (i) engages in making, providing, repairing, or 19    altering dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial 20    materials and devices which are returned to a dentist for 21    insertion into the human oral cavity or which come in 22    contact with its adjacent structures and tissues; and23        (ii) utilizes or employs a dental technician to 24    provide such services; and25        (iii) performs such functions only for a dentist or 26    dentists.  SB3211 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1    "Supervision" means supervision of a dental hygienist or a 2dental assistant requiring that a dentist authorize the 3procedure, remain in the dental facility while the procedure 4is performed, and approve the work performed by the dental 5hygienist or dental assistant before dismissal of the patient, 6but does not mean that the dentist must be present at all times 7in the treatment room.8    "General supervision" means supervision of a dental 9hygienist requiring that the patient be a patient of record, 10that the dentist examine the patient in accordance with 11Section 18 prior to treatment by the dental hygienist, and 12that the dentist authorize the procedures which are being 13carried out by a notation in the patient's record, but not 14requiring that a dentist be present when the authorized 15procedures are being performed. The issuance of a prescription 16to a dental laboratory by a dentist does not constitute 17general supervision.18    "Public member" means a person who is not a health 19professional. For purposes of board membership, any person 20with a significant financial interest in a health service or 21profession is not a public member.22    "Dentistry" means the healing art which is concerned with 23the examination, diagnosis, treatment planning, and care of 24conditions within the human oral cavity and its adjacent 25tissues and structures, as further specified in Section 17.26    "Branches of dentistry" means the various specialties of   SB3211 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1dentistry which, for purposes of this Act, shall be limited to 2the following: endodontics, oral and maxillofacial surgery, 3orthodontics and dentofacial orthopedics, pediatric dentistry, 4periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial 5radiology, dental anesthesiology, oral and maxillofacial 6pathology, dental public health, oral medicine, and orofacial 7pain.8    "Specialist" means a dentist who has received a specialty 9license pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 11.10    "Dental technician" means a person who owns, operates, or 11is employed by a dental laboratory and engages in making, 12providing, repairing, or altering dental prosthetic appliances 13and other artificial materials and devices which are returned 14to a dentist for insertion into the human oral cavity or which 15come in contact with its adjacent structures and tissues.16    "Informed consent" means legally valid consent that is 17given by a patient or legal guardian, that is recorded in 18writing or digitally, that authorizes intervention or 19treatment services from the treating dentist, and that 20documents agreement to participate in those services and 21knowledge of the risks, benefits, and alternatives, including 22the decision to withdraw from or decline treatment. 23    "Impaired dentist" or "impaired dental hygienist" means a 24dentist or dental hygienist who is unable to practice with 25reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental 26disability as evidenced by a written determination or written   SB3211 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1consent based on clinical evidence, including deterioration 2through the aging process, loss of motor skills, abuse of 3drugs or alcohol, or a psychiatric disorder, of sufficient 4degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent 5patient care.6    "Nurse" means a registered professional nurse, a certified 7registered nurse anesthetist licensed as an advanced practice 8registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse licensed under 9the Nurse Practice Act.10    "Patient of record", except as provided in Section 17.2, 11means a patient for whom the patient's most recent dentist has 12obtained a relevant medical and dental history and on whom the 13dentist has performed a physical examination within the last 14year and evaluated the condition to be treated, including a 15review of the patient's most recent x-rays.16    "Dental responder" means a dentist or dental hygienist who 17is appropriately certified in disaster preparedness, 18immunizations, and dental humanitarian medical response 19consistent with the Society of Disaster Medicine and Public 20Health and training certified by the National Incident 21Management System or the National Disaster Life Support 22Foundation. 23    "Mobile dental van or portable dental unit" means any 24self-contained or portable dental unit in which dentistry is 25practiced that can be moved, towed, or transported from one 26location to another in order to establish a location where   SB3211 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1dental services can be provided.2    "Public health dental hygienist" means a hygienist who 3holds a valid license to practice in the State, has 2 years of 4full-time clinical experience or an equivalent of 4,000 hours 5of clinical experience, and has completed at least 42 clock 6hours of additional structured courses in dental education in 7advanced areas specific to public health dentistry.8    "Public health setting" means a federally qualified health 9center; a federal, State, or local public health facility; 10Head Start; a special supplemental nutrition program for 11Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) facility; a certified 12school-based health center or school-based oral health 13program; a prison; or a long-term care facility.14    "Public health supervision" means the supervision of a 15public health dental hygienist by a licensed dentist who has a 16written public health supervision agreement with that public 17health dental hygienist while working in an approved facility 18or program that allows the public health dental hygienist to 19treat patients, without a dentist first examining the patient 20and being present in the facility during treatment, (1) who 21are eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured or whose 22household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 23poverty level. 24    "Teledentistry" means the use of telehealth systems and 25methodologies in dentistry and includes patient diagnosis, 26treatment planning, care, and education delivery for a patient   SB3211 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1of record using synchronous and asynchronous communications 2under an Illinois licensed dentist's authority as provided 3under this Act. 4    "Synchronous" means the transmission of a patient's health 5care information through a real-time, 2-way interaction 6between a patient and a dentist or dental office using 7audiovisual telecommunication technology. 8    "Moderate sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 9consciousness during which: (1) patients respond purposefully 10to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light 11tactile stimulation; (2) no interventions are required to 12maintain a patient's airway and spontaneous ventilation is 13adequate; and (3) cardiovascular function is usually 14maintained.15    "Deep sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 16consciousness during which: (1) patients cannot be easily 17aroused, but respond purposefully following repeated or 18painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently maintain 19ventilatory function may be impaired; (3) patients may require 20assistance in maintaining airways and spontaneous ventilation 21may be inadequate; and (4) cardiovascular function is usually 22maintained.23    "General anesthesia" means a drug-induced loss of 24consciousness during which: (1) patients are not arousable, 25even by painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently 26maintain ventilatory function is often impaired; (3) patients   SB3211 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1often require assistance in maintaining airways and positive 2pressure ventilation may be required because of depressed 3spontaneous ventilation or drug-induced depression of 4neuromuscular function; and (4) cardiovascular function may be 5impaired.6    "Venipuncture" means the puncture of a vein as part of a 7medical procedure, typically to withdraw a blood sample or for 8an intravenous catheter for the administration of medication 9or fluids.10    "Enteral route of administration" means administration of 11a drug that is absorbed through the gastrointestinal tract or 12through oral, rectal, or sublingual mucosa.13    "Parenteral route of administration" means administration 14of a drug by which the drug bypasses the gastrointestinal 15tract through intramuscular, intravenous, intranasal, 16submucosal, subcutaneous, or intraosseous methods. 17(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24; 103-902, eff. 198-9-24; 104-103, eff. 8-1-25; 104-151, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, 20eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-15-25.) 21    (225 ILCS 25/17.2)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)23    Sec. 17.2. Teledentistry.24    (a) As used in this Section, "patient of record" means a 25patient for whom the patient's most recent Illinois-licensed   SB3211 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1dentist has obtained a relevant medical and dental history and 2on whom the dentist has (i) performed a physical examination 3within the last year; (ii) obtained relevant records that are 4appropriate for the type of teledentistry service being 5provided from an in-person examination within the previous 12 6months, including a review of the patient's most recent 7x-rays; provided that if none are available, the supervising 8dentist must order x-rays and they must be reviewed by the 9licensed dentist prior to treatment; or (iii) established a 10relationship with the patient through an exchange of protected 11health information for the purpose of screening a patient 12providing emergency care, treatment, or services in accordance 13with the requirements of subsection (c); or (iv) established a 14relationship with the patient through an exchange of protected 15health information that meets the requirements of subsection 16(d) subsection (c). A patient who receives teledentistry 17services under this Section shall receive a referral to an 18Illinois-licensed dentist to receive appropriate in-person 19care. 20    (b) A dentist may only practice or utilize teledentistry 21on a patient of record. A dentist practicing dentistry through 22teledentistry is subject to the same standard of care and 23practice standards that are applicable to dental services 24provided in a clinic or office setting. A dentist may provide 25and delegate dental services using teledentistry to an 26Illinois-licensed dental hygienist only under the supervision   SB3211 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1requirements as specified in this Act for in-person care. A 2dental hygienist may perform oral prophylaxis procedures; may 3apply fluoride treatments, but not any product used for the 4remineralization of teeth, including, but not limited to, 5silver diamine fluoride; and may process x-rays as ordered by 6the supervising dentist on a patient of record only after an 7Illinois-licensed dentist has examined, diagnosed, and 8authorized such procedures using synchronous systems. A person 9is limited to 2 oral prophylaxis procedures performed by a 10licensed dental hygienist using teledentistry until an 11in-person examination by a licensed dentist has been 12completed. Local anesthetics and nitrous oxide may not be used 13during an oral prophylaxis procedure in a teledentistry 14service by a dental hygienist. Prior to providing 15teledentistry services to a patient, a dentist must obtain 16informed consent from the patient as to the treatment proposed 17to be offered through teledentistry by the dentist. The 18informed consent form shall include a written statement 19explaining the alternatives to and the capabilities and 20limitations of teledentistry and shall advise that a 21teledentistry interaction is not equivalent to an in-person 22clinical examination and that the dentist is not physically 23present. Such consent shall also be documented and included in 24the patient's record. A dentist and dental hygienist providing 25services via teledentistry under this Section shall provide 26the patient with their names his or her name, direct telephone   SB3211 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1numbers number, and physical practice addresses address. It is 2a violation of this Act for a provider of dental services 3rendering care through teledentistry to require a patient to 4sign an agreement that limits in any way the patient's ability 5to write a review of services received or file a complaint with 6the Department or other regulatory agency. The Department 7shall adopt rules, including, but not limited to, minimal 8technology standards for teledentistry and rules to provide 9for the use of teledentistry in the State of Illinois.10    (c) A dentist may treat a patient of record to provide 11emergent care or to conduct an initial screening consultation 12using teledentistry. An initial screening may only be provided 13using teledentistry by an Illinois-licensed dentist to assess 14suitability of the patient for treatment at a dental facility 15or for assessing for acute pain, infection, injury, or an 16intraoral or perioral condition that presents immediate harm 17or discomfort to the patient for which treatment cannot be 18postponed for the purpose of treating or assessing for acute 19pain, infection, injury, or any intraoral or perioral 20condition that presents immediate harm or discomfort to the 21patient for which treatment cannot be postponed. A provider of 22dental services rendering care or providing a screening 23through emergent care or conducting an initial consultation 24through teledentistry must direct the patient to receive 25appropriate in-person care after the provision of 26teledentistry services.   SB3211 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1    (d) An initial examination may be provided using 2teledentistry but shall only be conducted for the purpose of 3providing a consultation, for the provision of services 4authorized in subsection (b), or for treating or assessing 5acute pain, infection, injury, or any intraoral or perioral 6condition that presents immediate harm or discomfort to the 7patient for which treatment cannot be postponed. A provider of 8dental services rendering care or providing a teledentistry 9examination must direct the patient to receive appropriate 10in-person care after the provision of teledentistry services. 11An initial examination for new patients, excluding patients 12seeking orthodontic, sleep apnea, or snoring treatment or the 13functional and cosmetic replacement or treatment of teeth, may 14be conducted through teledentistry if the authorizing 15Illinois-licensed dentist establishes a bona fide 16dentist-patient relationship by reviewing the patient's 17medical and dental history and verifying both the patient's 18identity and physical location to ensure that dental care is 19being administered within the State.20    An initial examination for orthodontia, sleep apnea, or 21snoring treatment or the functional and cosmetic replacement 22or treatment of teeth shall be performed in person only. 23Additionally, an in-person clinical examination shall be 24performed immediately before providing or authorizing services 25or treatments to patients that are not reversible or that 26otherwise result in increased risk to the patient. For ongoing   SB3211 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18507 AAS 31949 b1dentist-patient relationships, dentists shall direct patients 2to be seen in person at least annually.3    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to expand the 4scope of practice for dental hygienists or establish 5independent hygiene practice. 6(Source: P.A. 103-902, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)